Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.240

School locker searches—Notice and reasonable suspicion requirements.

(1) In addition to the provisions in RCW 28A.600.230, the school principal, vice principal, or principal's designee may search all student lockers at any time without prior notice and without a reasonable suspicion that the search will yield evidence of any particular student's violation of the law or school rule.

(2) If the school principal, vice principal, or principal's designee, as a result of the search, develops a reasonable suspicion that a certain container or containers in any student locker contain evidence of a student's violation of the law or school rule, the principal, vice principal, or principal's designee may search the container or containers according to the provisions of RCW 28A.600.230(2).

[ 1990 c 33 s 504; 1989 c 271 s 247. Formerly RCW 28A.67.330.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 271: See note following RCW 9.94A.510.